src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/ca.dic
ablanir /MNZ
abordava/AZ
abscindir /MNZ
acamussava/AZ
acidificava/AZ
aclameir /MNZ
acolorir /MNZ
acorralava/AZ
acovardir /MNZ
adir /MNZ
adjectivava/AZ
advertir /MNZ
afalagava/AZ
aflacava/AZ
aflaquir /MNZ
afrevolir /MNZ
agilitzava/AZ
agredir /MNZ
ahucava/AZ
ajupir /MZ
alcofollava/AZ
alluentava/AZ
amagrir /MNZ
amargantejava/AZ
amoixir /MNZ
amonestava/AZ
amortir /MNZ
anellava/AZ
anyocava/AZ
aperduava/AZ
aplaudir /MNZ
aportava/AZ
aquietava/AZ
arraconava/AZ
arrasir /MNZ
arreveixinava/AZ
ascendir /MNZ
asfaltava/AZ
asserir /MNZ
assignava/AZ
assortir /MNZ
atemorir /MNZ
aterrossava/AZ
atrevir /MNZ
aureolava/AZ
autodestruir /MNZ
avivava/AZ
avortir /MNZ
ballava/A
barbutir /MN
bascava/A
bergantejava/A
blavejava/A
bleir /MN
bordonava/A
brandir /MN
braolava/A
bruixava/A
brunzir /MN
cabrafigava/A
calibrava/A
campir /MN
can onejava/A
captivava/A
carpir /MN
carrisquejava/A
cementava/A
circumdava/A
clapir /MN
clorava/A
coincidir /MN
collvinclava/A
col lidir /MN
commocionava/A
compatir /MN
comprimir /MN
concernir /MN
conciliava/A
condormir /M
confluir /MN
conglomerava/A
consistir /MN
consolidava/A
contendir /MN
contragirava/A
convertir /MN
cooptava/A
corroir /MN
corrugava/A
criminalitzava/A
curava/A
custodir /MN
declinava/A
deduir /MN
deflectir /MN
delejava/A
delir /MN
depredava/A
deprimir /MN
desaconduir /MN
desaferrava/A
desaparellava/A
desarrengava/A
desatapeir /MN
desbastava/A
descapitalitzava/A
descolorir /MN
descol locava/A
descrosterava/A
desembadalir /MN
desembargava/A
desembullava/A
desemmandrir /MN
desempastellava/A
desempobrir /MN
desencabestrava/A
desencavallava/A
desencongir /MN
desendogalava/A
desenfellonir /MN
desengavanyava/A
desengrevir /MN
desenllepolir /MN
desenravenava/A
desensuperbir /MN
desentortolligava/A
desentristir /MN
desestibava/A
desflorir /MN
desgasava/A
desigualava/A
desistir /MN
desllogava/A
desmotava/A
desnodrir /MN
desomplir /MN
desoxidava/A
despoblava/A
desproveir /MN
dessulfurava/A
destenyir /MN
desvagava/A
desvergonyir /MN
diferir /MN
dimitir /MN
dindava/A
discutir /MN
dissuadir /MN
divertir /MN
drapava/A
efluir /MNZ
eixorivir /MNZ
eluir /MNZ
embacinava/AZ
embasardir /MNZ
emblavir /MNZ
embordonir /MNZ
emborrossava/AZ
embrunir /MNZ
emmalaltir /MNZ
emmanseir /MNZ
emmidonava/AZ
emmudir /MNZ
empedreir /MNZ
empenyalava/AZ
empetitir /MNZ
empudeir /MNZ
enamorava/AZ
enardir /MNZ
encalentir /MNZ
encarrellava/AZ
encertir /MNZ
enconcava/AZ
encondolir /MNZ
endarrerir /MNZ
endropir /MNZ
enfarfegava/AZ
enfellonir /MNZ
enferotgir /MNZ
enforfoguir /MNZ
enfredorir /MNZ
engallofir /MNZ
engargamellava/AZ
engelabrir /MNZ
engolosir /MNZ
engrandir /MNZ
engruixir /MNZ
enllardissava/AZ
enllestir /MNZ
enrancir /MNZ
enrivetava/AZ
enronquir /MNZ
ensuperbir /MNZ
entatxonava/AZ
entorcir /MNZ
entresentir /MZ
entresoldava/AZ
enverdir /MNZ
enxiquir /MNZ
epigramatitzava/AZ
esboscassava/AZ
esbraveir /MNZ
escapollava/AZ
escindir /MNZ
escornava/AZ
esduir /MNZ
esgarriava/AZ
esmussava/AZ
espair /MNZ
espicossava/AZ
espunyir /MNZ
esquenava/AZ
estofava/AZ
estordir /MNZ
evangelitzava/AZ
excedir /MNZ
expandir /MNZ
exterminava/AZ
fallir /MN
fermava/A
florejava/A
fluir /MN
frasejava/A
funyir /M
gambejava/A
giscava/A
gruava/A
guarir /MN
honorificava/AZ
incidir /MNZ
inclinava/AZ
ingerir /MNZ
insolava/AZ
intercedir /MNZ
islamitzava/AZ
jaquir /MN
lladrunyava/A
lluentejava/A
malservir /MN
mancava/A
maximitzava/A
miniava/A
mudava/A
munyir /M
noliejava/A
obstruir /MNZ
opsonitzava/AZ
paltrigava/A
partir /MN
pelfava/A
perseguir /MN
petarrellejava/A
pleixellava/A
pouava/A
precedir /MN
presumir /MN
profetava/A
prosseguir /MN
queixalava/A
raucava/A
reabsorbir /MN
recollir /M
recolonitzava/A
recorregir /MN
reerigir /MN
reflexionava/A
refulgir /MN
rellentava/A
rellentir /MN
repercutir /MN
replanava/A
resclosir /MN
restituir /MN
retastava/A
retribuir /MN
revertir /MN
roborava/A
sagnava/A
seguir /MN
seixantejava/A
sobrecongelava/A
sofregir /MN
sopava/A
subsistir /MN
sumir /MN
suplantava/A
telefonava/A
tondosava/A
trair /MN
tranuitava/A
tremir /MN
tritllejava/A
vacunava/A
viava/A
vigir /MN
xarpava/A
